Hawaii statutes.
§201H-94 Eligible loans. (a) The
corporation shall establish requirements for property financed by an eligible
loan, and may consider the location, age, condition, and other characteristics
of the property.

(b) The corporation shall establish restrictions
on the terms, maturities, interest rates, collateral, and other requirements
for eligible loans.

(c) All eligible loans made shall comply with
applicable state and federal laws.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the corporation may provide homebuyer assistance in conjunction with
eligible loans through loans or other means; provided that the homebuyer
assistance:

(1) Is repaid through consideration to the
corporation, including borrower repayments; and

(2) Meets restrictions and requirements as
established in rules adopted by the corporation. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L
2013, c 135, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next